tr: Alternatör kasnak tipi: Kasnak dahil değil; Tek yönlü alternatör dekuplörü (OAD); Tek yönlü alternatör kasnağı (OAP); Serpatin kasnak dahil; Sabit kasnak; V kayışı kasnağı dahil; Diğer
fr: Type de poulie de l’alternateur: Aucune poulie incluse; Découpleur d’alternateur à roue libre (OAD); Poulie d’alternateur à roue libre (OAP); Poulie serpentine incluse; Poulie pleine; Poulie à courroie trapézoïdale incluse; Autre
hu: Generátor szíjtárcsatípusa: Szíjtárcsa nélkül; Szabadonfutós generátor-szétkapcsoló (OAD); Szabadonfutós generátor-szíjtárcsa (OAP); Bordásszíj-tárcsa mellékelve; Tömör szíjtárcsa; Ékszíj-tárcsa mellékelve; Egyéb
sl-SI: Tip jermenice alternatorja: Jermenica ni priložena; Sklopka prostotekoče jermenice (OAD); Prostotekoča jermenica alternatorja (OAP); Priložena jermenica za večklinasti jermen; Polna jermenica; Priložena jermenica za klinasti jermen; Drugo
sv: Typ av generatorremskiva: Ingen remskiva ingår; Frihjulsremskiva med frikoppling (OAD); Frihjulsremskiva (OAP); Multiribbremskiva ingår; Fast remskiva; Kilremskiva ingår; Annan
de: Typ der Lichtmaschinenriemenscheibe: Ohne Riemenscheibe; Lichtmaschinen-Freilaufentkoppler (OAD); Lichtmaschinen-Freilaufriemenscheibe (OAP); Mit Keilrippenriemenscheibe; Starre Riemenscheibe; Mit Keilriemenscheibe; Sonstige
zh-CN: 交流发电机皮带轮类型: 不含皮带轮; 交流发电机超越解耦器 (OAD); 交流发电机超越皮带轮 (OAP); 包含多楔带轮; 实心皮带轮; 包含 V 型皮带轮; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta remenice alternatora: Kolotur nije uključen; Razdjelnik alternatora sa slobodnim hodom (OAD); Kolotur alternatora sa slobodnim hodom (OAP); Uključen je serpentinski kolotur; Puni kolotur; Uključen je kolotur za klinasti remen; Ostalo
da: Generatorens remskivetype: Ingen remskive inkluderet; Friløbsremskive med dæmper (OAD); Friløbsremskive til generator (OAP); Multirilleremskive inkluderet; Fast remskive; Kileremskive inkluderet; Andet
vi: Loại puly máy phát điện: Không bao gồm puly; Puly máy phát điện trượt ngàm (OAD); Puly máy phát điện trượt trơn (OAP); Bao gồm puly gân; Puly khối; Bao gồm puly đai thang; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de polia do alternador: Nenhuma polia incluída; Desacoplador de alternador de roda livre (OAD); Polia de alternador de roda livre (OAP); Polia serpentina incluída; Polia sólida; Polia para correia em V incluída; Outro
fi: Vaihtovirtageneraattorin hihnapyörän tyyppi: Ei sisällä hihnapyörää; Laturin vapaakytkin (OAD); Laturin vapaakytkinhihnapyörä (OAP); Sisältää moniurahihnapyörän; Kiinteä hihnapyörä; Sisältää kiilahihnapyörän; Muu
el: Τύπος τροχαλίας εναλλάκτη: Δεν περιλαμβάνεται τροχαλία; Αποσυνδέκτης τροχαλίας εναλλάκτη (OAD); Ελεύθερη τροχαλία εναλλάκτη (OAP); Περιλαμβάνεται ραβδωτή τροχαλία; Συμπαγής τροχαλία; Περιλαμβάνεται τροχαλία V-belt; Άλλο
ko: 교류 발전기 풀리 유형: 풀리 미포함; 오버러닝 발전기 디커플러(OAD); 오버러닝 발전기 풀리(OAP); 서펜타인 풀리 포함; 솔리드 풀리; V벨트 풀리 포함; 기타
sk-SK: Typ remenice alternátora: Bez remenice; Voľnobežná remenica alternátora s tlmičom (OAD); Voľnobežná remenica alternátora (OAP); S drážkovanou remenicou; Pevná remenica; S klinovou remenicou; Iný
pt-PT: Tipo de polia do alternador: Sem polia incluída; Desacoplador de polia de alternador (OAD); Polia de roda livre de alternador (OAP); Polia serpentina incluída; Polia sólida; Polia de correia trapezoidal incluída; Outro
es: Tipo de polea del alternador: No incluye polea; Desacoplador de alternador de rueda libre (OAD); Polea de alternador de rueda libre (OAP); Incluye polea serpentina; Polea sólida; Incluye polea de correa trapezoidal; Otro
lt-LT: Alternatoriaus skriemulio tipas: Skriemulys nepridedamas; Inercinės generatoriaus movos atskyriklis (OAD); Inercinis generatoriaus skriemulys (OAP); Pridedamas daugiagriovelis skriemulys; Vientisas skriemulys; Pridedamas trapecinio diržo skriemulys; Kita
bg-BG: Тип шайба на алтернатора: Не е включена шайба; Разделителна шайба със свободен ход (OAD); Шайба на алтернатор със свободен ход (OAP); Включена е пистова шайба; Твърда шайба; Включена е шайба за клиновиден ремък; Друго
nl: Type dynamopoelie: Geen poelie inbegrepen; Overrunning alternator decoupler (OAD); Vrijloopalternatorpoelie (OAP); Multiriempoelie inbegrepen; Vaste poelie; V-snaarpoelie inbegrepen; Overig
cs: Typ řemenice alternátoru: Bez řemenice; Volnoběžná řemenice s tlumičem (OAD); Volnoběžná řemenice (OAP); Včetně drážkové řemenice; Pevná řemenice; Včetně klínové řemenice; Jiné
ro-RO: Tipul de scripete al alternatorului: Fără fulie inclusă; Decuplor de alternator cu depășire (OAD); Fulie de alternator cu depășire (OAP); Fulie canelată inclusă; Fulie solidă; Fulie curea trapezoidală inclusă; Altele
en: Alternator pulley type: No pulley included; Overrunning alternator decoupler (OAD); Overrunning alternator pulley (OAP); Serpentine pulley included; Solid pulley; V-belt pulley included; Other
it: Tipo di puleggia dell'alternatore: Nessuna puleggia inclusa; Disaccoppiatore puleggia alternatore (OAD); Puleggia a ruota libera alternatore (OAP); Puleggia a serpentina inclusa; Puleggia fissa; Puleggia per cinghia trapezoidale inclusa; Altro
zh-TW: 交流發電機皮帶輪類型: 不含皮帶輪; 單向減震皮帶輪 (OAD); 單向皮帶輪 (OAP); 含多楔皮帶輪; 實心皮帶輪; 含 V 型皮帶輪; 其他
ru: Тип шкива генератора: Без шкива в комплекте; Обгонная муфта генератора (OAD); Шкив генератора с обгонной муфтой (OAP); Поликлиновой шкив в комплекте; Сплошной шкив; Клиновой шкив в комплекте; Другое
nb: Generatorhjultype: Ingen remskive inkludert; Frihjulsremskive med frakobling (OAD); Frihjulsremskive (OAP); Multiremskive inkludert; Fast remskive; Kileremskive inkludert; Annet
ja: オルタネータープーリータイプ: プーリーなし; オーバーランニングオルタネーターデカプラー (OAD); オーバーランニングオルタネータープーリー (OAP); サーペンタインプーリー付属; ソリッドプーリー; Vベルトプーリー付属; その他
pl: Typ koła pasowego alternatora: Brak koła pasowego w zestawie; Z jednokierunkowym sprzęgłem (OAD); Z wolnobieżnym kołem pasowym (OAP); Koło pasowe wielorowkowe w zestawie; Koło pasowe stałe; Koło pasowe na pasek klinowy w zestawie; Inny
th: ประเภทพูลเลย์ของไดชาร์จ: ไม่รวมมู่เล่ย์; มู่เล่ย์ไดชาร์จแบบคลัตช์ (OAD); มู่เล่ย์คลัตช์ทางเดียว (OAP); รวมมู่เล่ย์สายพานแบบ Serpentine; มู่เล่ย์ทึบ; รวมมู่เล่ย์สายพานร่องวี; อื่นๆ